Washington statutes.
RCW 15.26.290

Contracts with public or private agencies to carry out chapter.

The commission may enter into agreement or contract with any private person or any private or public agency whether federal, state or local in order to carry out the purposes and provisions of this chapter.

[ 1969 c 129 s 29.]